Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.230

Other securities to be first exhausted.

Whenever any party to the suit, who holds a lien upon the property or any part thereof, has other securities for the payment of the amount of such lien, the court may in its discretion, order such sureties to be exhausted before a distribution of the proceeds of sale, or may order a just deduction to be made from the amount of the lien on the property on account thereof.

[Code 1881 s 574; 1877 p 121 s 577; 1869 p 137 s 527; RRS s 860.]